src/morphology/inflection/acronyms.lexc
! Acronyms are inflected using a colon, followed by the inflectional endings,
! which depend on either last letter of the word or inflection class of the
! last word of the abbreviation. The exception to the inflection scheme is the
! singular nominative, which appears without colon.
!
! Pronouncable abbreviations such as aids, hiv, kela, alko etc. are actually
! counted as regular words with regular inflection patterns.
!
! |VISK 169|

LEXICON AcronymStem/Common
[NUM=SG][CASE=NOM]:	Ennd	;
	Compounding/Dashed	;

LEXICON AcronymStem/2
	AcronymStem/Common	;
[NUM=SG][CASE=NOM]:%:	Possessive/Obligatory+Vn	;
[NUM=SG][CASE=NOM]:%:	Clitic/Obligatory	;
[NUM=PL][CASE=NOM]:%:t	Clitic/Optional	;
[NUM=SG][CASE=NOM]:%:n	Clitic/Optional	;
[NUM=SG][CASE=PAR]:%:{aä}	Possessive/Optional+Vn	;
[NUM=SG][CASE=ILL]:%:{aeiouyäö}{aeiouyäö}n	Possessive/Optional	;
[NUM=SG][CASE=ABE]:%:tt{aä}	Possessive/Optional+Vn	;
[NUM=SG][CASE=ABL]:%:lt{aä}	Possessive/Optional+Vn	;
[NUM=SG][CASE=ADE]:%:ll{aä}	Possessive/Optional+Vn	;
[NUM=SG][CASE=ALL]:%:lle	Possessive/Optional+Vn	;
[NUM=SG][CASE=ELA]:%:st{aä}	Possessive/Optional+Vn	;
[NUM=SG][CASE=ESS]:%:n{aä}	Possessive/Optional+Vn	;
[NUM=SG][CASE=INE]:%:ss{aä}	Possessive/Optional+Vn	;
[NUM=SG][CASE=TRA]:%:ksi	Clitic/Optional	;
[NUM=SG][CASE=TRA]:%:kse	Possessive/Obligatory+Vn	;
[NUM=PL][CASE=PAR]:%:j{aä}	Possessive/Optional+Vn	;
[NUM=PL][CASE=ILL]:%:ihin	Possessive/Optional	;
[NUM=PL][CASE=ABE]:%:itt{aä}	Possessive/Optional+Vn	;
[NUM=PL][CASE=ABL]:%:ilt{aä}	Possessive/Optional+Vn	;
[NUM=PL][CASE=ADE]:%:ill{aä}	Possessive/Optional+Vn	;
[NUM=PL][CASE=ALL]:%:ille	Possessive/Optional+Vn	;
[NUM=PL][CASE=ESS]:%:in{aä}	Possessive/Optional+Vn	;
[CASE=CMT]:%:ine	Possessive/Optional+Vn	;
[NUM=PL][CASE=ELA]:%:ist{aä}	Possessive/Optional+Vn	;
[NUM=PL][CASE=INE]:%:iss{aä}	Possessive/Optional+Vn	;
[NUM=PL][CASE=INS]:%:in	Clitic/Optional	;
[NUM=PL][CASE=TRA]:%:iksi	Clitic/Optional	;
[NUM=PL][CASE=TRA]:%:ikse	Possessive/Obligatory+Vn	;

LEXICON AcronymStem/a
	AcronymStem/A	;

LEXICON AcronymStem/A
	AcronymStem/Common	;
[NUM=SG][CASE=NOM]:%:	Possessive/Obligatory+Vn	;
[NUM=SG][CASE=NOM]:%:	Clitic/Obligatory	;
[NUM=PL][CASE=NOM]:%:t	Clitic/Optional	;
[NUM=SG][CASE=NOM]:%:n	Clitic/Optional	;
[NUM=SG][CASE=PAR]:%:ta	Possessive/Optional+Vn	;
[NUM=SG][CASE=ILL]:%:han	Possessive/Optional	;
[NUM=SG][CASE=ABE]:%:tta	Possessive/Optional+Vn	;
[NUM=SG][CASE=ABL]:%:lta	Possessive/Optional+Vn	;
[NUM=SG][CASE=ADE]:%:lla	Possessive/Optional+Vn	;
[NUM=SG][CASE=ALL]:%:lle	Possessive/Optional+Vn	;
[NUM=SG][CASE=ELA]:%:sta	Possessive/Optional+Vn	;
[NUM=SG][CASE=ESS]:%:na	Possessive/Optional+Vn	;
[NUM=SG][CASE=INE]:%:ssa	Possessive/Optional+Vn	;
[NUM=SG][CASE=TRA]:%:ksi	Clitic/Optional	;
[NUM=SG][CASE=TRA]:%:kse	Possessive/Obligatory+Vn	;
[NUM=PL][CASE=PAR]:%:ita	Possessive/Optional+Vn	;
[NUM=PL][CASE=ILL]:%:ihin	Possessive/Optional	;
[NUM=PL][CASE=ABE]:%:itta	Possessive/Optional+Vn	;
[NUM=PL][CASE=ABL]:%:ilta	Possessive/Optional+Vn	;
[NUM=PL][CASE=ADE]:%:illa	Possessive/Optional+Vn	;
[NUM=PL][CASE=ALL]:%:ille	Possessive/Optional+Vn	;
[NUM=PL][CASE=ESS]:%:ina	Possessive/Optional+Vn	;
[CASE=CMT]:%:ine	Possessive/Optional+Vn	;
[NUM=PL][CASE=ELA]:%:ista	Possessive/Optional+Vn	;
[NUM=PL][CASE=INE]:%:issa	Possessive/Optional+Vn	;
[NUM=PL][CASE=INS]:%:in	Clitic/Optional	;
[NUM=PL][CASE=TRA]:%:iksi	Clitic/Optional	;
[NUM=PL][CASE=TRA]:%:ikse	Possessive/Obligatory+Vn	;

LEXICON AcronymStem/b
	AcronymStem/ee	;

LEXICON AcronymStem/B
	AcronymStem/ee	;

LEXICON AcronymStem/c
	AcronymStem/ee	;

LEXICON AcronymStem/C
	AcronymStem/ee	;

LEXICON AcronymStem/d
	AcronymStem/ee	;

LEXICON AcronymStem/D
	AcronymStem/ee	;

LEXICON AcronymStem/e
	AcronymStem/ee	;

LEXICON AcronymStem/E
	AcronymStem/ee	;

LEXICON AcronymStem/g
	AcronymStem/ee	;

LEXICON AcronymStem/G
	AcronymStem/ee	;

LEXICON AcronymStem/p
	AcronymStem/ee	;

LEXICON AcronymStem/P
	AcronymStem/ee	;

LEXICON AcronymStem/v
	AcronymStem/ee	;

LEXICON AcronymStem/V
	AcronymStem/ee	;

LEXICON AcronymStem/w
	AcronymStem/ee	;

LEXICON AcronymStem/W
	AcronymStem/ee	;

LEXICON AcronymStem/t
	AcronymStem/ee	;

LEXICON AcronymStem/T
	AcronymStem/ee	;

LEXICON AcronymStem/ee
	AcronymStem/Common	;
[NUM=SG][CASE=NOM]:%:	Possessive/Obligatory+Vn	;
[NUM=SG][CASE=NOM]:%:	Clitic/Obligatory	;
[NUM=PL][CASE=NOM]:%:t	Clitic/Optional	;
[NUM=SG][CASE=NOM]:%:n	Clitic/Optional	;
[NUM=SG][CASE=PAR]:%:tä	Possessive/Optional+Vn	;
[NUM=SG][CASE=ILL]:%:hen	Possessive/Optional	;
[NUM=SG][CASE=ABE]:%:ttä	Possessive/Optional+Vn	;
[NUM=SG][CASE=ABL]:%:ltä	Possessive/Optional+Vn	;
[NUM=SG][CASE=ADE]:%:llä	Possessive/Optional+Vn	;
[NUM=SG][CASE=ALL]:%:lle	Possessive/Optional+Vn	;
[NUM=SG][CASE=ELA]:%:stä	Possessive/Optional+Vn	;
[NUM=SG][CASE=ESS]:%:nä	Possessive/Optional+Vn	;
[NUM=SG][CASE=INE]:%:ssä	Possessive/Optional+Vn	;
[NUM=SG][CASE=TRA]:%:ksi	Clitic/Optional	;
[NUM=SG][CASE=TRA]:%:kse	Possessive/Obligatory+Vn	;
[NUM=PL][CASE=PAR]:%:itä	Possessive/Optional+Vn	;
[NUM=PL][CASE=ILL]:%:ihin	Possessive/Optional	;
[NUM=PL][CASE=ABE]:%:ittä	Possessive/Optional+Vn	;
[NUM=PL][CASE=ABL]:%:iltä	Possessive/Optional+Vn	;
[NUM=PL][CASE=ADE]:%:illä	Possessive/Optional+Vn	;
[NUM=PL][CASE=ALL]:%:ille	Possessive/Optional+Vn	;
[NUM=PL][CASE=ESS]:%:inä	Possessive/Optional+Vn	;
[CASE=CMT]:%:ine	Possessive/Optional+Vn	;
[NUM=PL][CASE=ELA]:%:istä	Possessive/Optional+Vn	;
[NUM=PL][CASE=INE]:%:issä	Possessive/Optional+Vn	;
[NUM=PL][CASE=INS]:%:in	Clitic/Optional	;
[NUM=PL][CASE=TRA]:%:iksi	Clitic/Optional	;
[NUM=PL][CASE=TRA]:%:ikse	Possessive/Obligatory+Vn	;

LEXICON AcronymStem/i
	AcronymStem/ii	;

LEXICON AcronymStem/I
	AcronymStem/ii	;

LEXICON AcronymStem/j
	AcronymStem/ii	;

LEXICON AcronymStem/J
	AcronymStem/ii	;

LEXICON AcronymStem/ii
	AcronymStem/Common	;
[NUM=SG][CASE=NOM]:%:	Possessive/Obligatory+Vn	;
[NUM=SG][CASE=NOM]:%:	Clitic/Obligatory	;
[NUM=PL][CASE=NOM]:%:t	Clitic/Optional	;
[NUM=SG][CASE=NOM]:%:n	Clitic/Optional	;
[NUM=SG][CASE=PAR]:%:tä	Possessive/Optional+Vn	;
[NUM=SG][CASE=ILL]:%:hin	Possessive/Optional	;
[NUM=SG][CASE=ABE]:%:ttä	Possessive/Optional+Vn	;
[NUM=SG][CASE=ABL]:%:ltä	Possessive/Optional+Vn	;
[NUM=SG][CASE=ADE]:%:llä	Possessive/Optional+Vn	;
[NUM=SG][CASE=ALL]:%:lle	Possessive/Optional+Vn	;
[NUM=SG][CASE=ELA]:%:stä	Possessive/Optional+Vn	;
[NUM=SG][CASE=ESS]:%:nä	Possessive/Optional+Vn	;
[NUM=SG][CASE=INE]:%:ssä	Possessive/Optional+Vn	;
[NUM=SG][CASE=TRA]:%:ksi	Clitic/Optional	;
[NUM=SG][CASE=TRA]:%:kse	Possessive/Obligatory+Vn	;
[NUM=PL][CASE=PAR]:%:itä	Possessive/Optional+Vn	;
[NUM=PL][CASE=ILL]:%:ihin	Possessive/Optional	;
[NUM=PL][CASE=ABE]:%:ittä	Possessive/Optional+Vn	;
[NUM=PL][CASE=ABL]:%:iltä	Possessive/Optional+Vn	;
[NUM=PL][CASE=ADE]:%:illä	Possessive/Optional+Vn	;
[NUM=PL][CASE=ALL]:%:ille	Possessive/Optional+Vn	;
[NUM=PL][CASE=ESS]:%:inä	Possessive/Optional+Vn	;
[CASE=CMT]:%:ine	Possessive/Optional+Vn	;
[NUM=PL][CASE=ELA]:%:istä	Possessive/Optional+Vn	;
[NUM=PL][CASE=INE]:%:issä	Possessive/Optional+Vn	;
[NUM=PL][CASE=INS]:%:in	Clitic/Optional	;
[NUM=PL][CASE=TRA]:%:iksi	Clitic/Optional	;
[NUM=PL][CASE=TRA]:%:ikse	Possessive/Obligatory+Vn	;

LEXICON AcronymStem/h
	AcronymStem/oo	;

LEXICON AcronymStem/H
	AcronymStem/oo	;

LEXICON AcronymStem/k
	AcronymStem/oo	;

LEXICON AcronymStem/K
	AcronymStem/oo	;

LEXICON AcronymStem/o
	AcronymStem/oo	;

LEXICON AcronymStem/O
	AcronymStem/oo	;

LEXICON AcronymStem/å
	AcronymStem/oo	;

LEXICON AcronymStem/Å
	AcronymStem/oo	;

LEXICON AcronymStem/oo
	AcronymStem/Common	;
[NUM=SG][CASE=NOM]:%:	Possessive/Obligatory+Vn	;
[NUM=SG][CASE=NOM]:%:	Clitic/Obligatory	;
[NUM=PL][CASE=NOM]:%:t	Clitic/Optional	;
[NUM=SG][CASE=NOM]:%:n	Clitic/Optional	;
[NUM=SG][CASE=PAR]:%:ta	Possessive/Optional+Vn	;
[NUM=SG][CASE=ILL]:%:hon	Possessive/Optional	;
[NUM=SG][CASE=ABE]:%:tta	Possessive/Optional+Vn	;
[NUM=SG][CASE=ABL]:%:lta	Possessive/Optional+Vn	;
[NUM=SG][CASE=ADE]:%:lla	Possessive/Optional+Vn	;
[NUM=SG][CASE=ALL]:%:lle	Possessive/Optional+Vn	;
[NUM=SG][CASE=ELA]:%:sta	Possessive/Optional+Vn	;
[NUM=SG][CASE=ESS]:%:na	Possessive/Optional+Vn	;
[NUM=SG][CASE=INE]:%:ssa	Possessive/Optional+Vn	;
[NUM=SG][CASE=TRA]:%:ksi	Clitic/Optional	;
[NUM=SG][CASE=TRA]:%:kse	Possessive/Obligatory+Vn	;
[NUM=PL][CASE=PAR]:%:ita	Possessive/Optional+Vn	;
[NUM=PL][CASE=ILL]:%:ihin	Possessive/Optional	;
[NUM=PL][CASE=ABE]:%:itta	Possessive/Optional+Vn	;
[NUM=PL][CASE=ABL]:%:ilta	Possessive/Optional+Vn	;
[NUM=PL][CASE=ADE]:%:illa	Possessive/Optional+Vn	;
[NUM=PL][CASE=ALL]:%:ille	Possessive/Optional+Vn	;
[NUM=PL][CASE=ESS]:%:ina	Possessive/Optional+Vn	;
[CASE=CMT]:%:ine	Possessive/Optional+Vn	;
[NUM=PL][CASE=ELA]:%:ista	Possessive/Optional+Vn	;
[NUM=PL][CASE=INE]:%:issa	Possessive/Optional+Vn	;
[NUM=PL][CASE=INS]:%:in	Clitic/Optional	;
[NUM=PL][CASE=TRA]:%:iksi	Clitic/Optional	;
[NUM=PL][CASE=TRA]:%:ikse	Possessive/Obligatory+Vn	;

LEXICON AcronymStem/q
	AcronymStem/uu	;

LEXICON AcronymStem/Q
	AcronymStem/uu	;

LEXICON AcronymStem/u
	AcronymStem/uu	;

LEXICON AcronymStem/U
	AcronymStem/uu	;

LEXICON AcronymStem/uu
	AcronymStem/Common	;
[NUM=SG][CASE=NOM]:%:	Possessive/Obligatory+Vn	;
[NUM=SG][CASE=NOM]:%:	Clitic/Obligatory	;
[NUM=PL][CASE=NOM]:%:t	Clitic/Optional	;
[NUM=SG][CASE=NOM]:%:n	Clitic/Optional	;
[NUM=SG][CASE=PAR]:%:ta	Possessive/Optional+Vn	;
[NUM=SG][CASE=ILL]:%:hun	Possessive/Optional	;
[NUM=SG][CASE=ABE]:%:tta	Possessive/Optional+Vn	;
[NUM=SG][CASE=ABL]:%:lta	Possessive/Optional+Vn	;
[NUM=SG][CASE=ADE]:%:lla	Possessive/Optional+Vn	;
[NUM=SG][CASE=ALL]:%:lle	Possessive/Optional+Vn	;
[NUM=SG][CASE=ELA]:%:sta	Possessive/Optional+Vn	;
[NUM=SG][CASE=ESS]:%:na	Possessive/Optional+Vn	;
[NUM=SG][CASE=INE]:%:ssa	Possessive/Optional+Vn	;
[NUM=SG][CASE=TRA]:%:ksi	Clitic/Optional	;
[NUM=SG][CASE=TRA]:%:kse	Possessive/Obligatory+Vn	;
[NUM=PL][CASE=PAR]:%:ita	Possessive/Optional+Vn	;
[NUM=PL][CASE=ILL]:%:ihin	Possessive/Optional	;
[NUM=PL][CASE=ABE]:%:itta	Possessive/Optional+Vn	;
[NUM=PL][CASE=ABL]:%:ilta	Possessive/Optional+Vn	;
[NUM=PL][CASE=ADE]:%:illa	Possessive/Optional+Vn	;
[NUM=PL][CASE=ALL]:%:ille	Possessive/Optional+Vn	;
[NUM=PL][CASE=ESS]:%:ina	Possessive/Optional+Vn	;
[CASE=CMT]:%:ine	Possessive/Optional+Vn	;
[NUM=PL][CASE=ELA]:%:ista	Possessive/Optional+Vn	;
[NUM=PL][CASE=INE]:%:issa	Possessive/Optional+Vn	;
[NUM=PL][CASE=INS]:%:in	Clitic/Optional	;
[NUM=PL][CASE=TRA]:%:iksi	Clitic/Optional	;
[NUM=PL][CASE=TRA]:%:ikse	Possessive/Obligatory+Vn	;

LEXICON AcronymStem/f
	AcronymStem/äX	;

LEXICON AcronymStem/F
	AcronymStem/äX	;

LEXICON AcronymStem/l
	AcronymStem/äX	;

LEXICON AcronymStem/L
	AcronymStem/äX	;

LEXICON AcronymStem/m
	AcronymStem/äX	;

LEXICON AcronymStem/M
	AcronymStem/äX	;

LEXICON AcronymStem/n
	AcronymStem/äX	;

LEXICON AcronymStem/N
	AcronymStem/äX	;

LEXICON AcronymStem/r
	AcronymStem/äX	;

LEXICON AcronymStem/R
	AcronymStem/äX	;

LEXICON AcronymStem/s
	AcronymStem/äX	;

LEXICON AcronymStem/S
	AcronymStem/äX	;

LEXICON AcronymStem/š
	AcronymStem/äX	;

LEXICON AcronymStem/Š
	AcronymStem/äX	;

LEXICON AcronymStem/x
	AcronymStem/äX	;

LEXICON AcronymStem/X
	AcronymStem/äX	;
